Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
ARTICLE 9
VETERANS SERVICE OFFICE AND OFFICERS

26-9-101 to 26-9-105. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire article repealed, p. 355, § 4, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 10 of chapter 119, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 2002, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. The provisions of this article were relocated to part 8 of article 5 of title 28. For the location of specific provisions, see the editor's notes following each section in said part 8.

Cross references:

For the current provisions regarding veterans service office and officers, see part 8 of article 5 of title 28, C.R.S.